Utah statutes.
58-71-804.   Insurance coverage not mandated.
(1)  This chapter does not mandate health insurance coverage for naturopathic
medical services.
(2)  This chapter does not establish a class of health care providers for the
purposes of Section 31A-22-618.
(3)  This chapter does not mandate health insurance coverage for the
prescription or administration of testosterone, as described in Subsection
58-71-102(8)(e), by a naturopathic physician.
